Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB251.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 158.840 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The General Assembly hereby finds that reading and mathematics proficiency are gateway skills necessary for
all Kentucky students to achieve the academic goals established in KRS 158.6451. It is the General
Assembly's intent that:
(a) All students in kindergarten through grade three (3) having difficulty in reading and mathematics
receive early diagnosis and intervention services from highly trained teachers;
(b) All students in kindergarten through grade three (3) needing to make accelerated progress toward
proficiency in mathematics based on data from valid and reliable universal screening and diagnostic
assessments receive high-quality, evidence-based mathematics instruction and intervention aligned to
the Kentucky academic standards for mathematics;
(c) All students demonstrate proficiency in reading and mathematics as they progress through the relevant
curricula and complete each assessment level required by the Kentucky Board of Education for the state
assessment program established under KRS 158.6453 and in compliance with the requirements of the
federal Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015, Pub. L. No. 114-95, or its successor; and
(d) Students who are struggling in reading and mathematics or are not at the proficient level on statewide
assessments shall be provided evidence-based and developmentally appropriate diagnostic and
intervention services, and instructional modifications necessary to learn.
The General Assembly, the Kentucky Board of Education, the Kentucky Department of Education, the
Council on Postsecondary Education, colleges and universities, local boards of education, school
administrators, school councils, teachers, parents and families, and other educational entities, such as the
Education Professional Standards Board, P-16 councils, the statewide reading research center established
under KRS 164.0207, and the Center for Middle School Academic Achievement must collaborate if the
intentions specified in this subsection are to be met. Intensive focus on student achievement in reading and
mathematics does not negate the responsibility of any entity to help students obtain proficiency in other core
curriculum content areas.
(2) The General Assembly's role is to set policies that address the achievement levels of all students and provide
resources for the professional growth of teachers and administrators, assessing students' academic
achievement, including valid and reliable universal screening and diagnostic assessment and instructional
interventions, technology innovations, targeted reading and mathematics statewide initiatives, research and the
distribution of research findings, services for students beyond the regular school day, and other services
needed to help struggling learners.
(3) The Kentucky Board of Education shall regularly review and modify, when appropriate, its statewide
assessment policies and practices to enable local school districts and schools to carry out the provisions of the
statewide assessment and accountability system, required under KRS 158.6453 to improve student
achievement in mathematics and reading.
(4) The Kentucky Department of Education shall:
(a) Provide assistance to schools and teachers, including publicizing professional development
opportunities, methods of measuring effective professional development, the availability of high quality
instructional materials, and developmentally appropriate, valid, and reliable screening and diagnostic
assessments of student competency in mathematics and reading. The department shall provide access to
samples of units of study, annotated student work, diagnostic instruments, and research findings, and
give guidance on parental engagement;
(b) Work with state and national educators and subject-matter experts to identify student reading and
mathematical skills in each subject area that align with the state content standards adopted under KRS
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
158.6453 and identify teaching strategies in each subject area that can be used explicitly to develop the
identified reading and mathematical skills under this paragraph;
(c) Encourage the development of comprehensive middle and high school adolescent reading and
mathematics plans to be incorporated into the curricula of each subject area to improve the reading
comprehension and mathematical skills of all students;
(d) Conduct an annual review of the state grant programs it manages and make recommendations, when
needed, to the Interim Joint Committee on Education for changes to statutory requirements that are
necessary to gain a greater return on investment;
(e) Provide administrative support and oversight to programs to train classroom coaches and mentors to
help teachers with reading and mathematics instruction; and
(f) Require no reporting of instructional plans, formative assessment results, staff effectiveness processes,
or interventions implemented in the classroom, except for:
1. Interventions implemented under KRS 158.305(2) and 158.8402;
2. Funds provided under KRS 158.792 or 158.844; or
3. Schools that are identified for comprehensive support and improvement and fail to exit
comprehensive support and improvement status after three (3) consecutive years of
implementing the turnaround intervention process as described in KRS 160.346.
(5) The [Council on Postsecondary Education, in cooperation with the ]Education Professional Standards Board,
in cooperation with the Council on Postsecondary Education, shall exercise its duties and functions under
KRS 161.028[164.020] to ensure that teacher education programs are fulfilling the needs of Kentucky for
highly skilled teachers. The Education Professional Standards Board[council] shall:
(a) Coordinate the federal and state grant programs it administers with other statewide initiatives relating to
improving student achievement in reading and mathematics to avoid duplication of effort and to make
efficient use of resources;
(b) [No later than November 1 of each year, ]Submit a[an annual] report every three (3) years to the
Legislative Research Commission for referral to the appropriate Interim Joint Committee on Education
and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue, summarizing the compliance of each
teacher preparation program for alignment to early childhood education or elementary regular education
standards and to the instructional requirements set forth in KRS 164.306(1) and 164.3061; and
(c) Regularly report program data to an external evaluator for[Require that an external evaluator provide]
an annual analysis of the ability of teacher preparation programs to properly train and equip teacher
preparation program students with the literacy and mathematics content knowledge and skills to educate
students in kindergarten through grade three (3)[.]; and
(d) [(6) The Education Professional Standards Board shall ]Exercise its duties and responsibilities under
KRS 161.030 and 161.048 to ensure highly qualified teachers.
(6)[(7)] Colleges and universities shall:
(a) Utilize institution-wide resources to work with elementary and secondary educators and other entities to
align curriculum content to ensure that students who achieve proficiency on standards established at the
prekindergarten through secondary levels will require no remediation to successfully enter a
postsecondary education program;
(b) Provide quality undergraduate teacher preparation programs to ensure that those preparing to teach
reading or mathematics at all grade levels have the necessary content knowledge, assessment and
diagnostic skills, and teaching methodologies and that teachers in all subject areas have the requisite
skills for helping students at all grade levels develop critical strategies and skills for reading and
comprehending subject matter;
(c) Deliver evidence-based continuing education for teachers in reading and mathematics through
institutes, graduate level courses, and other professional development activities that support a statewide
agenda for improving student achievement in reading and mathematics;

CHAPTER 17 3
(d) Conduct or assist with research on best practices in assessment, intervention strategies, teaching
methodologies, costs and effectiveness of instructional models, and other factors as appropriate to
reading and mathematics;
(e) Provide staff to consult and provide technical assistance to teachers, staff, and administrators at
elementary, middle, and secondary school sites;
(f) Assume active roles in the statewide initiatives referenced in KRS 156.553 and 158.842; and
(g) Develop written procedures for measuring the effectiveness of activities outlined in paragraphs (a) to (f)
of this subsection.
(7)[(8)] School councils at all school levels are encouraged to identify and allocate resources to qualified
teachers to become coaches or mentors in mathematics or coaches or mentors in reading with a focus on
improving student achievement in their respective schools.
(8)[(9)] Local school boards and superintendents shall provide local resources to supplement or match state and
federal resources to support teachers, school administrators, and school councils in helping students achieve
proficiency in reading and mathematics.
(9)[(10)] Local school superintendents shall provide leadership and resources to the principals of all schools to
facilitate curriculum alignment, communications, and technical support among schools to ensure that students
are academically prepared to move to the next level of schooling.
Signed by Governor March 15, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version